Alaska statutes. Title 42. Public Utilities and Carriers and Energy Programs.
Chapter 08. In-State Pipeline Contract Carrier.

Cross references. —

For a temporary provision tolling deadlines for statutory and regulatory action by the Regulatory Commission of Alaska during the COVID-19 public health disaster emergency declared on March 11, 2020, see § 18, ch. 10, SLA 2020 in the 2020 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effective dates. —

Section 27, ch. 11, SLA 2013 makes this chapter effective May 22, 2013, in accordance with AS

01.10.070(c)

.